North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-19.1 North Dakota Business Corporation Act
10-19.1-128.
Effect of extension.

Filing with the secretary of state of articles of amendment extending the period of duration of a corporation:

Relates back to the date of expiration of the original period of duration of the corporation as provided in the articles;

Validates contracts or other acts within the authority of the articles, and the corporation is liable for those contracts or acts; and

Restores to the corporation all the assets and rights of the corporation to the extent they were held by the corporation before expiration of its original period of duration, except those sold or otherwise distributed after that time.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

10-19.1-129.
Service of process on corporation, foreign corporation, and nonresident directors.

Any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the corporation, the foreign corporation, or any director may be served as provided in section 10-01.1-13.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1995, ch. 103, § 44; 1997, ch. 51, § 1; 1999, ch. 50, § 23; 1999, ch. 95, § 39; 2003, ch. 85, § 20; 2005, ch. 100, § 35; 2007, ch. 99, § 18.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-11.

Cross-References.

Service on domestic corporations generally, see N.D.R.Civ.P. 4(d)(2).

Collateral References.

Setting aside default judgment for failure of statutory agent on whom process was served to notify defendant, 20 A.L.R.2d 1179.

“Managing agent” of domestic corporation within statute providing for service of summons or process thereon, 71 A.L.R.2d 178.

Dissolved domestic corporation, service in absence of express statutory direction, 75 A.L.R.2d 1399.

Who is “general” or “managing” agent of foreign corporation under statute authorizing service of process on such agent, 17 A.L.R.3d 625.

Validity, construction, and application of “fiduciary shield” doctrine — modern cases, 79 A.L.R.5th 587.

10-19.1-130.
State interested — Proceedings.

If it appears at any stage of a proceeding in a court in this state that the state is, or is likely to be, interested therein, or that it is a matter of general public interest, the court shall order that a copy of the complaint or petition be served upon the attorney general in the same manner prescribed for serving a summons in a civil action. The attorney general shall intervene in a proceeding when the attorney general determines that the public interest requires it, whether or not the attorney general has been served.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

10-19.1-131.
Foreign trade zones. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 50, § 79.

10-19.1-132.
Foreign corporation — Governing law.

Subject to the constitution of this state, the laws of the jurisdiction under which a foreign corporation is incorporated govern its incorporation and internal activities.

Nothing in this chapter authorizes this state to regulate the incorporation or internal activities of a foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation may not be denied a certificate of authority to conduct activities in this state by reason of any difference between the laws of the jurisdiction under which the foreign corporation was incorporated and the laws of this state.

A foreign corporation holding a valid certificate of authority in this state has no greater rights and privileges than a domestic corporation. The certificate of authority does not authorize the foreign corporation to exercise any of its powers or purposes that a domestic corporation is forbidden by law to exercise in this state.

A foreign corporation may not be denied a certificate of authority to conduct activities in this state by reason of any difference between the laws of the jurisdiction under which the foreign corporation is incorporated and the laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 64.

Cross-References.

Foreign bank or trust company serving as fiduciary in state, see N.D.C.C. §§ 6-08-25 to 6-08-28.

Foreign fraternal benefit societies, see N.D.C.C. § 26.1-15.1-29.

Foreign insurers, see ch. 26.1-11; N.D.C.C. § 26.1-12-27.

10-19.1-133.
Foreign corporation — Name.

A foreign corporation may apply for a certificate of authority under any name that would be available to a domestic corporation, whether or not the name is the name under which it is authorized in its jurisdiction of incorporation. A trade name must be registered as provided in chapter 47-25 when applying for a certificate of authority under a name different from the name authorized in the jurisdiction of incorporation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 65.

10-19.1-134.
Foreign corporation — Admission of foreign corporation — Transacting business — Obtaining licenses and permits.

A foreign corporation may not:

Transact business in this state or obtain any license or permit required by this state until it has procured a certificate of authority from the secretary of state.

Transact any business in this state prohibited to a domestic corporation incorporated under this chapter.

Be denied a certificate of authority because the laws of the state or country where the corporation is incorporated differ from the laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 66.

10-19.1-135.
Foreign corporation application for certificate of authority.

An applicant for a certificate shall file with the secretary of state an application executed by an authorized person and setting forth:

The name of the foreign corporation and, if different, the name under which it proposes to transact business in this state;

The jurisdiction of its incorporation;

The date of incorporation in the jurisdiction of its incorporation and the period of duration of the foreign corporation;

The address of the principal executive office of the foreign corporation;

The name of the registered agent of the foreign corporation as provided in chapter 10-01.1, and if a noncommercial registered agent, the address of such noncommercial registered agent in this state;

The purpose of the corporation which it proposes to pursue in transacting business in this state;

The names and addresses of the directors and officers of the foreign corporation; and

Any additional information deemed necessary or appropriate by the secretary of state to enable the secretary of state to determine whether the foreign corporation is entitled to a certificate of authority to transact business in this state.

The application must be accompanied by payment of the fees provided in section 10-19.1-147 together with a certificate of good standing or a certificate of existence duly authenticated by the incorporating officer of the state or country where the corporation is incorporated.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 67; 2007, ch. 99, § 19.

10-19.1-136.
Foreign corporation — Issuance of certificate of authority.

If the secretary of state finds an application for a certificate of authority conforms to law and all fees have been paid, the secretary shall:

Endorse on the application the word “filed” and the date of the filing;

File the application and the certificate of good standing or certificate of existence; and

Issue to the corporation or its representative a certificate of authority to transact business in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 68; 2007, ch. 99, § 20.

10-19.1-137.
Foreign corporation — Amendments to the certificate of authority.

If any statement in the application for a certificate of authority by a foreign corporation is false when made or the foreign corporation changes the foreign corporation’s name or purposes sought in this state, the foreign corporation promptly shall file with the secretary of state an application for an amended certificate of authority executed by an authorized person correcting the statement and, in the case of a change in the foreign corporation’s name, a certificate to that effect authenticated by the proper officer of the jurisdiction under the laws of which the foreign corporation is incorporated.

In the case of a dissolution, a foreign corporation need not file an application for an amended certificate of authority but shall promptly file with the secretary of state a certificate to that effect authenticated by the proper officer of the jurisdiction under the laws of which the foreign corporation is incorporated.

A foreign corporation that changes the foreign corporation’s name and applies for an amended certificate of authority, and is the owner of a service mark, trademark, or trade name, is a general partner named in a fictitious name certificate, is a general partner in a limited partnership or limited liability limited partnership, or is a managing partner in a limited liability partnership that is on file with the secretary of state, shall change the foreign corporation’s name in each of the foregoing registrations that is applicable when the foreign corporation files an application for an amended certificate of authority.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 69; 1999, ch. 95, § 40; 2009, ch. 106, § 21.

10-19.1-138.
Foreign corporation — Registered agent — Registered office.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall continuously maintain a registered agent in this state as provided in chapter 10-01.1 and, if a noncommercial registered agent, the address of such noncommercial registered agent in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 70; 2007, ch. 99, § 21.

10-19.1-139.
Foreign corporation — Merger of foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state.

If a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state is a party to a statutory merger permitted by the laws of the jurisdiction under which the foreign corporation is incorporated, and the foreign corporation is not the surviving organization, the surviving organization shall, within thirty days after the merger becomes effective, file with the secretary of state a certified statement of merger duly authenticated by the proper officer of the state or country where the statutory merger was effected. Any foreign organization that is the surviving organization in a merger and which will continue to transact business in this state shall procure a certificate of authority if not previously authorized to transact business in the state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 101, § 71; 1999, ch. 95, § 41.

10-19.1-139.1.
Foreign corporation — Conversion of foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state.

If a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state converts to another organization permitted by its governing statute, within thirty days after the conversion becomes effective, the newly created organization resulting from the conversion shall file with the secretary of state a certified statement of conversion duly authenticated by the proper officer of the jurisdiction in which the statutory conversion was effected. Any foreign organization that is the converted organization in a conversion and which will continue to transact business in this state shall obtain a certificate of authority or applicable registration in accordance with the North Dakota governing statute applicable to the converted organization.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 203, § 35.

10-19.1-140.
Foreign corporation — Certificate of withdrawal.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state may withdraw from this state upon procuring from the secretary of state a certificate of withdrawal. In order to procure the certificate, the foreign corporation shall file with the secretary of state an application for withdrawal, together with the fees provided in section 10-19.1-147, which must set forth:

The name of the corporation and the state or country under the laws of which it is incorporated;

That the corporation is not transacting business in this state;

That the corporation surrenders its authority to transact business in this state;

That service of process in any action, suit, or proceeding based upon any cause of action arising in this state during the time the corporation was authorized to transact business in this state may thereafter be made on such corporation as provided in section 10-01.1-13;

A post-office address to which a person may mail a copy of any process against the corporation; and

Any additional information necessary or appropriate to enable the secretary of state to determine and assess any unpaid fees payable by the foreign corporation.

The filing with the secretary of state of a certificate of dissolution, or a certificate of merger if the corporation is not the surviving organization, from the proper officer of the state or country under the laws of which the corporation is incorporated constitutes a valid application of withdrawal and the authority of the corporation to transact business in this state shall cease upon filing of the certificate.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 72; 2007, ch. 99, § 22.

10-19.1-141.
Foreign corporation — Revocation of certificate of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 73; 2005, ch. 100, § 36; 2007, ch. 99, § 23; 2011, ch. 87, § 21; repealed by 2015, ch. 86, § 24, effective August 1, 2015.

10-19.1-142.
Foreign corporation — Transaction of business without certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation transacting business in this state may not maintain any claim, action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state until it possesses a certificate of authority.

The failure of a foreign corporation to obtain a certificate of authority does not impair the validity of any contract or act of the foreign corporation or prevent the foreign corporation from defending any claim, action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state.

A foreign corporation, by transacting business in this state without a certificate of authority, appoints the secretary of state as its agent upon whom any notice, process, or demand may be served.

A foreign corporation that transacts business in this state without a valid certificate of authority is liable to the state for the years or parts of years during which it transacted business in this state without the certificate in an amount equal to all fees that would have been imposed by this chapter upon that corporation had it duly obtained the certificate, filed all reports required by this chapter, and paid all penalties imposed by this chapter. The attorney general shall bring proceedings to recover all amounts due this state under the provisions of this section.

A foreign corporation that transacts business in this state without a valid certificate of authority is subject to a civil penalty, payable to the state, and not to exceed five thousand dollars. Each director and each officer or agent who authorizes, directs, or participates in the transaction of business in this state on behalf of a foreign corporation that does not have a certificate is subject to a civil penalty, payable to the state, and not to exceed one thousand dollars.

The civil penalties set forth in subsection 5 may be recovered in an action brought within the district court of Burleigh County by the attorney general. Upon a finding by the court that a foreign corporation or any of its members, directors, officers, or agents have transacted business in this state in violation of this chapter, the court shall issue, in addition to the imposition of a civil penalty, an injunction restraining the further transaction of the business of the foreign corporation and the further exercise of any rights and privileges by the corporation in this state. The foreign corporation must be enjoined from transacting business in this state until all civil penalties plus any interest and court costs that the court may assess have been paid and until the foreign corporation has otherwise complied with the provisions of this chapter.

A member of a foreign corporation is not liable for the debts and obligations of the corporation solely by reason of the corporation having transacted business in this state without a valid certificate of authority.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 74.

10-19.1-143.
Foreign corporation — Transactions not constituting transacting business.

The following activities of a foreign corporation, among others, do not constitute transacting business within the meaning of this chapter:

Maintaining, defending, or settling any proceeding;

Holding meetings of its shareholders or carrying on any other activities concerning its internal activities;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of the foreign corporation’s own securities or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through employees, agents, or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages, and security interest in real or personal property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages and security interests in property securing the debts; or

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within thirty days and that is not one in the course of repeated transactions of a like manner.

The term “transacting business” as used in this section has no effect on personal jurisdiction under the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.

For purposes of this section, any foreign corporation that owns income-producing real or tangible personal property in this state, other than property exempted under subsection 1, will be considered transacting business in this state.

The list of activities in subsection 1 is not exhaustive. This section does not apply in determining the contracts or activities that may subject a foreign corporation to service of process or taxation in this state or to regulation under any other law of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 75.

10-19.1-144.
Foreign corporation — Action by attorney general.

The attorney general may bring an action to restrain a foreign corporation from transacting business in this state in violation of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 76.

10-19.1-145.
Foreign corporation — Service of process.

Service of process on a foreign corporation must be as provided in section 10-01.1-13.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 77; 2005, ch. 100, § 37; 2007, ch. 99, § 24.

10-19.1-146.
Secretary of state — Annual report of corporations and foreign corporations — Involuntary dissolution — Revocation of certificate of authority.

Each corporation and each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall file, within the time provided in subsection 3, an annual report setting forth:

The name of the corporation or foreign corporation and the state or country under the laws of which the corporation or foreign corporation is incorporated.

The address of the registered office of the corporation or foreign corporation in this state, the name of the corporation’s or foreign corporation’s registered agent in this state at that address, and the address of the corporation’s or foreign corporation’s principal executive office.

A brief statement of the character of the business in which the corporation or foreign corporation is actually engaged in this state.

The names and respective addresses of the officers and directors of the corporation or foreign corporation.

In the case of a domestic corporation, a statement of the aggregate number of shares the corporation has authority to issue, itemized by classes, par value of shares, shares without par value, and series, if any, within a class.

In the case of a domestic corporation, a statement of the aggregate number of issued shares, itemized by classes, par value of shares, shares without par value, and series, if any, within a class.

The annual report must be submitted on forms prescribed by the secretary of state. The information provided must be given as of the date of the execution of the report. The annual report must be signed as provided in subsection 58 of section 10-19.1-01. If the corporation or foreign corporation is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, it must be signed on behalf of the corporation or foreign corporation by the receiver or trustee. The secretary of state may destroy all annual reports provided for in this section after they have been on file for six years.

Except for the first annual report, the annual report must be delivered to the secretary of state:

By a corporation, before August second of each year; and

By a foreign corporation, before May sixteenth of each year.

The secretary of state must file the annual report if the annual report conforms to the requirements of this section and all fees have been paid as provided in section 10-19.1-147.

If the annual report does not conform, it must be returned to the corporation or foreign corporation for any necessary correction or payment.

If the annual report is corrected and filed before the date provided in subsection 3, or within thirty days after the annual report was returned by the secretary of state for correction, then the penalties provided in section 10-19.1-147 for the failure to file an annual report within the time provided do not apply.

Three months after the date provided in subsection 3, any corporation or foreign corporation failing to file its annual report is not in good standing. After the corporation or foreign corporation becomes not in good standing, the secretary of state shall notify the corporation or foreign corporation that its certificate of incorporation or certificate of authority is not in good standing and that it may be dissolved or revoked as provided in subsection 6 or 7.

The secretary of state must mail the notice of impending dissolution or revocation to the last registered agent at the last registered office.

If the corporation or foreign corporation files its annual report after the notice is mailed, together with the filing fee and the late filing penalty fee provided in section 10-19.1-147, then the secretary of state shall restore its certificate of incorporation or certificate of authority to good standing.

A corporation that fails to file its annual report, together with the filing and penalty fees for late filing provided in section 10-19.1-147, within one year after the date provided in subsection 3 ceases to exist as a corporation and is considered involuntarily dissolved by operation of law.

The secretary of state shall note the dissolution of the corporation’s certificate of incorporation on the records of the secretary of state and shall give notice of the action to the dissolved corporation.

Notice by the secretary of state must be mailed to the last registered agent at the last registered office.

A foreign corporation that fails to file its annual report, together with the filing and penalty fees for late filing provided in section 10-19.1-147, within one year after the date provided in subsection 3 forfeits its authority to transact business in this state.

The secretary of state shall note the revocation of the foreign corporation’s certificate of authority on the records of the secretary of state and shall give notice of the action to the foreign corporation.

Notice by the secretary of state must be mailed to the foreign corporation’s last registered agent at the last registered office.

The decision by the secretary of state that a certificate of authority must be revoked under this subsection is final.

A corporation dissolved for failure to file an annual report, or a foreign corporation whose authority was forfeited for failure to file an annual report, may be reinstated by filing the most recent past-due report, together with the filing and penalty fees for all past-due annual reports and a reinstatement fee as provided in section 10-19.1-147. The fees must be paid and an annual report filed within one year following the involuntary dissolution or revocation. Reinstatement under this subsection does not affect the rights or liability for the time from the dissolution or revocation to the reinstatement.

The first annual report of either a corporation or foreign corporation must be delivered before the date provided in the year following the calendar year in which the certificate of incorporation or certificate of authority was issued by the secretary of state, or in the case of a corporation, in the year following the calendar year of the effective date stated in the articles of incorporation.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 78; 1999, ch. 95, § 42; 2003, ch. 48, § 4; 2003, ch. 85, § 21; 2005, ch. 100, § 38; 2007, ch. 99, § 25; 2007, ch. 101, § 36; 2009, ch. 106, § 22; 2011, ch. 87, § 22; 2013, ch. 89, § 8; 2019, ch. 94, § 16, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 92, § 5, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 10-19.1-146 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 5 of Chapter 92, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2326; and Section 16 of Chapter 94, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1045.

10-19.1-146.1.
Secretary of state — Involuntary dissolution — Revocation of certificate of authority.

With respect to involuntary dissolution of a corporation by the secretary of state:

A corporation may be involuntarily dissolved by the secretary of state if:

The corporation has failed to appoint and maintain a registered agent and registered office as provided in section 10-19.1-15; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record submitted by the corporation pursuant to this chapter.

A corporation may not be dissolved by the secretary of state as provided for in this section unless:

The secretary of state has given the corporation not less than sixty days’ notice by mail addressed to its registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the corporation does not maintain a registered agent in this state, the notice must be mailed to its principal office; and

During the sixty-day period, the corporation has failed to:

File the report of change as provided in chapter 10-01.1 regarding the registered office or the registered agent;

File any other required record; or

Correct the misrepresentation.

Upon expiration of sixty days after the mailing of the notice, the existence of the corporation ceases. The secretary of state shall issue a notice of dissolution and shall mail the notice addressed to its registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the corporation does not maintain a registered agent in this state, the notice must be mailed to its principal office.

With respect to the revocation of a certificate of authority of a foreign corporation by the secretary of state:

The certificate of a foreign corporation to transact business in this state may be revoked by the secretary of state if:

The foreign corporation has failed to:

Appoint and maintain a registered agent and registered office as provided in section 10-19.1-138;

File with the secretary of state any amendment to its application for a certificate of authority as provided in section 10-19.1-137;

File with the secretary of state any merger as provided in section 10-19.1-139; or

File with the secretary of state an application for certificate of withdrawal of its authority as provided in section 10-19.1-140 when the corporation’s existence has expired or the foreign corporation has been dissolved in the jurisdiction of the foreign corporation; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record submitted by the foreign corporation under this chapter.

A certificate of authority may not be revoked by the secretary of state as provided for in this section unless:

The secretary of state has given the foreign corporation not less than sixty days’ notice by mail addressed to its registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the corporation failed to maintain a registered agent in this state, the notice must be mailed to its principal office; and

During the sixty-day period, the foreign corporation has failed to:

File the report of change as provided in chapter 10-01.1 regarding the registered office or the registered agent;

File any amendment;

File any merger;

File an application for withdrawal;

File any other required record; or

Correct the misrepresentation.

Upon expiration of sixty days after the mailing of the notice, the authority of the foreign corporation to transact business in this state ceases. The secretary of state shall issue a notice of revocation and shall mail the notice to the registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the foreign corporation failed to maintain a registered agent in this state, the notice must be mailed to its principal office.

If the corporation or foreign corporation files a report of change relating to the registered agent or any other required record or correction of a misrepresentation after the notice with the fee provided for in section 10-19.1-147, the secretary of state shall restore the certificate of incorporation or authority to good standing. Until restored to good standing, the secretary of state may not accept for filing any document respecting the corporation or foreign corporation except those incident to its dissolution or withdrawal.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 86, § 11, effective August 1, 2015.

10-19.1-147.
Fees for filing records — Issuing certificates — License fees.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect for:

Filing articles of incorporation and issuing a certificate of incorporation, one hundred dollars.

Filing articles of amendment, twenty dollars.

Filing a statement of correction, twenty dollars.

Filing restated articles of incorporation, thirty dollars.

Filing articles of conversion of a corporation or a certificate of fact of conversion of a foreign corporation, fifty dollars and:

If the organization resulting from the conversion will be a domestic organization governed by the laws of this state, then the fees provided by the governing laws to establish or register a new organization like the organization resulting from the conversion; or

If the organization resulting from the conversion will be a foreign organization that will transact business in this state, then the fees provided by the governing laws to obtain a certificate of authority or register an organization like the organization resulting from the conversion.

Filing abandonment of conversion, fifty dollars.

Filing articles of merger or consolidation and issuing a certificate of merger or consolidation, fifty dollars.

Filing articles of abandonment of merger, fifty dollars.

Filing an application to reserve a corporate name, ten dollars.

Filing a notice of transfer of a reserved corporate name, ten dollars.

Filing a cancellation of reserved corporate name, ten dollars.

Filing a consent to use of name, ten dollars.

Filing a statement of change of address of registered office, change of registered agent, or both, or a change of address of registered office by registered agent, the fee provided in section 10-01.1-03.

Filing a statement of the establishment of a series of shares, twenty dollars.

Filing a statement of cancellation of shares, twenty dollars.

Filing a statement of reduction of stated capital, twenty dollars.

Filing a statement of intent to dissolve, ten dollars.

Filing a statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings, ten dollars.

Filing articles of dissolution, twenty dollars.

Filing an application of a foreign corporation for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state and issuing a certificate of authority, one hundred forty-five dollars.

Filing an application of a foreign corporation for an amended certificate of authority to transact business in this state and issuing an amended certificate of authority, forty dollars.

Filing a certificate of fact stating a merger or consolidation of a foreign corporation holding a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, fifty dollars.

Filing an application for withdrawal of a foreign corporation and issuing a certificate of withdrawal, twenty dollars.

Filing an annual report of a corporation or foreign corporation, twenty-five dollars.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect additional fees for late filing of the annual report as follows:

Within ninety days after the date provided in subsection 3 of section 10-19.1-146, twenty dollars;

Thereafter, sixty dollars; and

After the involuntary dissolution of a corporation, or the revocation of the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation, the reinstatement fee of one hundred thirty-five dollars.

Fees paid to the secretary of state according to this subsection are not refundable if an annual report submitted to the secretary of state cannot be filed because it lacks information required by section 10-19.1-146, or the annual report lacks sufficient payment as required by this subsection.

Filing any process, notice, or demand for service, the fee provided in section 10-01.1-03.

Furnishing a certified copy of any record, instrument, or paper relating to a corporation, the fee provided in section 54-09-04 for copying a record and fifteen dollars for the certificate and affixing the seal thereto.

Any record submitted for approval before the actual time of submission for filing, one-half of the fee provided in this section for filing the record.

Filing any other statement of a corporation or foreign corporation, ten dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 79; 1999, ch. 95, § 43; 2005, ch. 100, § 39; 2007, ch. 99, § 26; 2007, ch. 101, § 37; 2009, ch. 106, § 23; 2011, ch. 87, § 23.

10-19.1-148.
Secretary of state — Powers — Enforcement — Penalty — Appeal.

The secretary of state has the power and authority reasonably necessary to efficiently administer this chapter and to perform the duties imposed thereby.

The secretary of state may propound to any corporation or foreign corporation that is subject to this chapter and to any officer, director, or employee thereof, any interrogatory reasonably necessary and proper to ascertain whether the corporation has complied with all provisions of this chapter applicable to the corporation.

The interrogatory must be answered within thirty days after mailing, or within any additional time as must be fixed by the secretary of state. The answer to the interrogatory must be full and complete and must be made in writing and under oath.

If the interrogatory is directed:

To an individual, it must be answered by that individual; or

To a corporation, it must be answered by the president, vice president, secretary, or assistant secretary of the corporation.

The secretary of state is not required to file any record to which the interrogatory relates until the interrogatory has been answered, and not then if the answers disclose the record is not in conformity with this chapter.

The secretary of state shall certify to the attorney general, for action the attorney general may deem appropriate, an interrogatory and answers thereto, which discloses a violation of this chapter.

Each officer, director, or employee of a corporation or foreign corporation who fails or refuses within the time provided by subdivision a to answer truthfully and fully an interrogatory propounded to that person by the secretary of state is guilty of an infraction.

An interrogatory propounded by the secretary of state and the answers are not open to public inspection. The secretary of state may not disclose any facts or information obtained from the interrogatory or answers except insofar as permitted by law or insofar as required for evidence in any criminal proceedings or other action by this state.

If the secretary of state rejects any record required by this chapter to be approved by the secretary of state before the record may be filed, then the secretary of state shall give written notice of the rejection to the person that delivered the record, specifying the reasons for rejection.

Within thirty days after the service of the notice of denial, the corporation or foreign corporation, as the case may be, may appeal to the district court in the judicial district serving Burleigh County by filing with the clerk of the court a petition setting forth a copy of the record sought to be filed and a copy of the written rejection of the record by the secretary of state.

The matter must be tried de novo by the court. The court shall either sustain the action of the secretary of state or direct the secretary of state to take the action the court determines proper.

If the secretary of state dissolves a corporation or revokes the certificate of authority to transact business in this state of any foreign corporation, pursuant to section 10-19.1-146.1, then the corporation or foreign corporation may appeal to the district court in the judicial district serving Burleigh County by filing with the clerk of the court a petition, including:

A copy of the corporation’s articles of incorporation and a copy of the notice of dissolution given by the secretary of state; or

A copy of the certificate of authority of the foreign corporation to transact business in this state and a copy of the notice of revocation given by the secretary of state.

If the court order sought is one for reinstatement of a corporation that has been dissolved as provided in subsection 6 of section 10-19.1-146, or for reinstatement of the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation that has been revoked as provided in subsection 7 of section 10-19.1-146, then together with any other actions the court deems proper, any such order which reverses the decision of the secretary of state shall require the corporation or foreign corporation to:

File the most recent past-due annual report;

Pay the fees to the secretary of state for all past-due annual reports as provided in subsection 24 of section 10-19.1-147; and

Pay the reinstatement fee to the secretary of state as provided in subsection 24 of section 10-19.1-147.

Appeals from all final orders and judgments entered by the district court under this section in review of any ruling or decision of the secretary of state are treated as other civil actions.

The court shall try the matter de novo. The court shall sustain the action of the secretary of state or direct the secretary of state to take the action the court determines proper.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 80; 2005, ch. 100, § 40; 2009, ch. 106, §
24; 2015, ch. 86, § 12, effective August 1, 2015.